Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,119.02
Tax Commissioner; provide information to Legislative Fiscal Analyst.

Pursuant to section 50-420 and the duties prescribed in section 77-27,159, the Tax Commissioner shall upon request provide the Legislative Fiscal Analyst all information used to develop revenue projections under section 77-27,159 and all information used to develop fiscal notes that may relate to revised revenue forecasts. Such information shall be provided in a form which does not violate section 77-27,119.

Laws 1987, LB 773, § 28;

Laws 1992, LB 988, § 17.